Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-3] Election of a domestic
corporation to become a sustainable business corporation. (a) A domestic
corporation incorporated under chapter 414 may elect to become a sustainable
business corporation under this chapter by including in its articles or
amending its articles to include a statement that the corporation is a
sustainable business corporation. An amendment pursuant to this subsection
shall not be effective unless it is adopted by at least the minimum status
vote.

(b) If a corporation that is not a sustainable
business corporation is a party to a merger, consolidation, or division, or is
the exchanging corporation in a share exchange, and the surviving, new, or any
resulting corporation in the merger, consolidation, division, or share exchange
is to be a sustainable business corporation, then the plan of merger,
consolidation, division, or share exchange shall not be effective unless it is
adopted by the corporation by at least the minimum status vote. [L 2011, c 209,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next